Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.450

Notice—Relocation within the same school district.

(1) When the intended relocation of the child is within the school district in which the child currently resides the majority of the time, the person intending to relocate the child, in lieu of notice prescribed in RCW 26.09.440, may provide actual notice by any reasonable means to every other person entitled to residential time or visitation with the child under a court order.

(2) A person who is entitled to residential time or visitation with the child under a court order may not object to the intended relocation of the child within the school district in which the child currently resides the majority of the time, but he or she retains the right to move for modification under RCW 26.09.260.

[ 2000 c 21 s 7.]

NOTES:

Intent—Captions not law—2000 c 21: See notes following RCW 26.09.405.